Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1618.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 406.2. Restaurant Satellite Location Permit.--(a) The holder of a restaurant license may obtain a restaurant satellite location permit to establish and operate up to two 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 additional locations within this Commonwealth for the purpose of selling alcohol, and may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages by the glass, open bottle or other container, and any mixture, for consumption only in that part of the restaurant satellite location habitually used for the serving of food to guests or patrons, subject to the conditions of this section.(b) A restaurant satellite location may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages only during the time periods and within the same capacity in which the primary licensed premises is permitted to sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages, including if the restaurant licensee possesses a Sunday sales permit, wine expanded permit, amusement permit or extended hours food permit.(c) A restaurant satellite location may share space with a nonlicensed business, including a restaurant or food establishment, provided that the restaurant licensee retains operations control and complies with all board regulations concerning alcohol service, safety and access control.(d) A restaurant satellite location must be a reputable place operated by responsible persons of good reputation and habitually and principally used for the purpose of providing food for the public. The place must have an area within a building of not less than four hundred square feet, be equipped with tables and chairs, including bar seats, to accommodate at least thirty persons at one time. The board shall, by regulation, specify what constitutes tables and chairs sufficient to accommodate thirty persons at one time.(e) A restaurant licensee must receive approval by the governing body of the municipality in which the additional location is to be located prior to the issuance of a restaurant satellite location permit by the board. Upon request for 20250HB1618PN1952 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approval of a restaurant satellite location permit, the governing body of the municipality shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving comments and recommendations of interested individuals residing within the municipality concerning the applicant's request for a restaurant satellite location permit. A copy of the approval must be submitted with the restaurant satellite location permit. Failure by the governing body to render a decision within forty-five days of the applicant's request for approval shall be deemed approval of the application in terms as presented unless the governing body has notified the applicant in writing of the governing body's election to extend the time, which extension may not exceed sixty days. Failure by the governing body to render a decision within the extended time period shall be deemed an approval of the application in terms as presented.(f) An applicant for a restaurant satellite location permit must file a written application with the board in such form and containing such information as the board prescribes. The application shall contain a description of the location for which the applicant desires a permit and shall state such other material information, description or plan of the location where it is proposed to keep and sell liquor as may be required by the regulations of the board. The descriptions, information and plans must show the proposed location for the restaurant satellite location, or the proposed location for the construction of the restaurant satellite location, at the time the application is made, and must show any alteration proposed to be made to the location, or the new building proposed to be constructed after the approval by the board of the application for a permit. After approval of the application, the permittee 20250HB1618PN1952 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall make the physical alterations, improvements and changes to the restaurant satellite location premises, or shall construct the new building in the manner specified by the board at the time of approval, and the permittee may not transact any business under the license until the board has approved the completed physical alteration, improvement and change to the restaurant satellite location premises, or the completed construction of the new building as conforming to the specifications required by the board at the time of issuance of the permit, and is satisfied that the restaurant satellite location meets the specifications required by this act and the board. The board may require that all alterations or construction or conformity to definition be completed within six months from the time of issuance of the permit. The applicant shall submit to the board proof of financial capability to operate a satellite location and a business plan outlining operations, security measures and responsible alcohol service practices. Failure to comply with these requirements shall be considered cause for revocation of the permit. Permits under this section are nontransferable and each restaurant satellite location must apply for and possess its own permit, regardless of both permits existing in connection to the same restaurant licensee.(g) An applicant for a new license or for the transfer of an existing license shall post, for a period of at least thirty days beginning with the day the application is filed with the board, in a conspicuous place on the outside of the premises or at the proposed new location for which the license is applied, a notice of the application. The notice shall be in such form, be of such size, and contain such provisions as the board may 20250HB1618PN1952 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 require by regulation. The licensee shall file with the board proof of the posting of the notice.(h) If an affiant intentionally makes a false statement in an application, the affiant shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to the penalties provided by this article.(i) The board shall approve or deny an application for a restaurant satellite location permit within fourteen days of receipt of the application. Failure of the board to approve or deny the application shall result in the application being deemed approved.(j) A restaurant licensee that wishes to obtain a restaurant satellite location permit must pay the permitting fee as the board prescribes. The permit is valid only for a period of up to two years and only so long as the restaurant licensee maintains a valid restaurant license. If the restaurant license of the restaurant licensee is suspended or revoked by the board, any restaurant satellite location connected to the license shall not be permitted to operate.(k) The board shall refuse an application for a restaurant satellite location permit if the proposed location is within three hundred feet of a church, hospital, charitable institution, school or public playground, or if the proposed location is within two hundred feet of any other premises licensed by the board or of a restaurant satellite location permit. The board shall refuse an application for a restaurant satellite location permit if, in the board's opinion, the restaurant satellite location permit would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of five hundred feet of the 20250HB1618PN1952 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proposed location.(l) A servant, agent or employe at a restaurant satellite location shall be employed by the restaurant licensee in connection with the restaurant satellite location permit and subject to the same conditions and qualifications as those imposed on any servant, agent or employe of a restaurant licensee.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1618PN1952 - 6 - 12345678